California, session 20252026, AB711.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2016.040 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:2016.040. (a) A meet and confer declaration in support of a motion shall state facts showing a reasonable and good faith attempt at an informal resolution of each issue presented by the motion.(b) The declaration shall also include whether the moving party has met and conferred, including through an electronic communication, regarding the retention of a certified shorthand reporter to report the hearing on the motion. This subdivision does not prevent the retention of a certified shorthand reporter.